Illinois, session 104th, HB3469.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Arsonist Registry Act is amended by 5changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (730 ILCS 148/10)7    Sec. 10. Statewide Arsonist Database. 8    (a) The Illinois State Police shall establish and maintain 9a Statewide Arsonist Database for the purpose of identifying 10arsonists and making that information available to law 11enforcement and the general public. For every person convicted 12of a violation of an arson offense on or after the effective 13date of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly, the 14Statewide Arsonist Database shall contain information relating 15to each arsonist for a period of 10 years after conviction for 16an arson offense. The information may include the arsonist's 17name, date of birth, offense or offenses requiring inclusion 18in the Statewide Arsonist Database, the conviction date and 19county of each such offense, and such other identifying 20information as the Illinois State Police deems necessary to 21identify the arsonist, but shall not include the social 22security number of the arsonist. The registry may include a 23photograph of the arsonist.   HB3469- 2 -LRB104 09192 RLC 22292 b1    (b) The Illinois State Police may adopt rules in 2accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act to 3implement this Section and those rules must include procedures 4to ensure that the information in the database is accurate, 5and that the information in the database reflects any changes 6based on the reversal of a conviction for an offense requiring 7inclusion in the Statewide Arsonist Database, or a court order 8requiring the sealing or expungement of records relating to 9the offense. A certified copy of such an order shall be deemed 10prima facie true and correct and shall be sufficient to 11require the immediate amendment or removal of any person's 12information from the Statewide Arsonist Database by the 13Illinois State Police. 14    (c) The Illinois State Police, or any other law 15enforcement or registering agency, shall not impose a fee for 16registration on any person subject to this Act. 17    (d) The Illinois State Police must have the Statewide 18Arsonist Database created and ready to comply with the 19requirements of this Section no later than July 1, 2025.20(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-609, eff. 7-1-24.) 21    Section 10. The Sex Offender Registration Act is amended 22by changing Section 3 as follows: 23    (730 ILCS 150/3)24    Sec. 3. Duty to register.   HB3469- 3 -LRB104 09192 RLC 22292 b1    (a) A sex offender, as defined in Section 2 of this Act, or 2sexual predator shall, within the time period prescribed in 3subsections (b) and (c), register in person and provide 4accurate information as required by the Illinois State Police. 5Such information shall include a current photograph, current 6address, current place of employment, the sex offender's or 7sexual predator's telephone number, including cellular 8telephone number, the employer's telephone number, school 9attended, all e-mail addresses, instant messaging identities, 10chat room identities, and other Internet communications 11identities that the sex offender uses or plans to use, all 12Uniform Resource Locators (URLs) registered or used by the sex 13offender, all blogs and other Internet sites maintained by the 14sex offender or to which the sex offender has uploaded any 15content or posted any messages or information, extensions of 16the time period for registering as provided in this Article 17and, if an extension was granted, the reason why the extension 18was granted and the date the sex offender was notified of the 19extension. The information shall also include a copy of the 20terms and conditions of parole or release signed by the sex 21offender and given to the sex offender by his or her 22supervising officer or aftercare specialist, the county of 23conviction, license plate numbers for every vehicle registered 24in the name of the sex offender, the age of the sex offender at 25the time of the commission of the offense, the age of the 26victim at the time of the commission of the offense, and any   HB3469- 4 -LRB104 09192 RLC 22292 b1distinguishing marks located on the body of the sex offender. 2A sex offender convicted under Section 11-6, 11-20.1, 311-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 11-21 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 4Criminal Code of 2012 shall provide all Internet protocol (IP) 5addresses in his or her residence, registered in his or her 6name, accessible at his or her place of employment, or 7otherwise under his or her control or custody. If the sex 8offender is a child sex offender as defined in Section 11-9.3 9or 11-9.4 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 102012, the sex offender shall report to the registering agency 11whether he or she is living in a household with a child under 1218 years of age who is not his or her own child, provided that 13his or her own child is not the victim of the sex offense. The 14sex offender or sexual predator shall register: 15        (1) with the chief of police in the municipality in 16    which he or she resides or is temporarily domiciled for a 17    period of time of 3 or more days, unless the municipality 18    is the City of Chicago, in which case he or she shall 19    register at a fixed location designated by the 20    Superintendent of the Chicago Police Department; or 21        (2) with the sheriff in the county in which he or she 22    resides or is temporarily domiciled for a period of time 23    of 3 or more days in an unincorporated area or, if 24    incorporated, no police chief exists. 25    If the sex offender or sexual predator is employed at or 26attends an institution of higher education, he or she shall   HB3469- 5 -LRB104 09192 RLC 22292 b1also register: 2        (i) with: 3            (A) the chief of police in the municipality in 4        which he or she is employed at or attends an 5        institution of higher education, unless the 6        municipality is the City of Chicago, in which case he 7        or she shall register at a fixed location designated 8        by the Superintendent of the Chicago Police 9        Department; or10            (B) the sheriff in the county in which he or she is 11        employed or attends an institution of higher education 12        located in an unincorporated area, or if incorporated, 13        no police chief exists; and 14        (ii) with the public safety or security director of 15    the institution of higher education which he or she is 16    employed at or attends. 17    The registration fees shall only apply to the municipality 18or county of primary registration, and not to campus 19registration. 20    For purposes of this Article, the place of residence or 21temporary domicile is defined as any and all places where the 22sex offender resides for an aggregate period of time of 3 or 23more days during any calendar year. Any person required to 24register under this Article who lacks a fixed address or 25temporary domicile must notify, in person, the agency of 26jurisdiction of his or her last known address within 3 days   HB3469- 6 -LRB104 09192 RLC 22292 b1after ceasing to have a fixed residence.2    A sex offender or sexual predator who is temporarily 3absent from his or her current address of registration for 3 or 4more days shall notify the law enforcement agency having 5jurisdiction of his or her current registration, including the 6itinerary for travel, in the manner provided in Section 6 of 7this Act for notification to the law enforcement agency having 8jurisdiction of change of address. 9    Any person who lacks a fixed residence must report weekly, 10in person, with the sheriff's office of the county in which he 11or she is located in an unincorporated area, or with the chief 12of police in the municipality in which he or she is located. 13The agency of jurisdiction will document each weekly 14registration to include all the locations where the person has 15stayed during the past 7 days. 16    The sex offender or sexual predator shall provide accurate 17information as required by the Illinois State Police. That 18information shall include the sex offender's or sexual 19predator's current place of employment. 20    (a-5) An out-of-state student or out-of-state employee 21shall, within 3 days after beginning school or employment in 22this State, register in person and provide accurate 23information as required by the Illinois State Police. Such 24information will include current place of employment, school 25attended, and address in state of residence. A sex offender 26convicted under Section 11-6, 11-20.1, 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or   HB3469- 7 -LRB104 09192 RLC 22292 b111-21 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 2shall provide all Internet protocol (IP) addresses in his or 3her residence, registered in his or her name, accessible at 4his or her place of employment, or otherwise under his or her 5control or custody. The out-of-state student or out-of-state 6employee shall register: 7        (1) with:8            (A) the chief of police in the municipality in 9        which he or she attends school or is employed for a 10        period of time of 5 or more days or for an aggregate 11        period of time of more than 30 days during any calendar 12        year, unless the municipality is the City of Chicago, 13        in which case he or she shall register at a fixed 14        location designated by the Superintendent of the 15        Chicago Police Department; or 16            (B) the sheriff in the county in which he or she 17        attends school or is employed for a period of time of 5 18        or more days or for an aggregate period of time of more 19        than 30 days during any calendar year in an 20        unincorporated area or, if incorporated, no police 21        chief exists; and22        (2) with the public safety or security director of the 23    institution of higher education he or she is employed at 24    or attends for a period of time of 5 or more days or for an 25    aggregate period of time of more than 30 days during a 26    calendar year.  HB3469- 8 -LRB104 09192 RLC 22292 b1    The registration fees shall only apply to the municipality 2or county of primary registration, and not to campus 3registration.4    The out-of-state student or out-of-state employee shall 5provide accurate information as required by the Illinois State 6Police. That information shall include the out-of-state 7student's current place of school attendance or the 8out-of-state employee's current place of employment. 9    (a-10) Any law enforcement agency registering sex 10offenders or sexual predators in accordance with subsections 11(a) or (a-5) of this Section shall forward to the Attorney 12General a copy of sex offender registration forms from persons 13convicted under Section 11-6, 11-20.1, 11-20.1B, 11-20.3, or 1411-21 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 152012, including periodic and annual registrations under 16Section 6 of this Act.17    (b) Any sex offender, as defined in Section 2 of this Act, 18or sexual predator, regardless of any initial, prior, or other 19registration, shall, within 3 days of beginning school, or 20establishing a residence, place of employment, or temporary 21domicile in any county, register in person as set forth in 22subsection (a) or (a-5). 23    (c) The registration for any person required to register 24under this Article shall be as follows: 25        (1) Any person registered under the Habitual Child Sex 26    Offender Registration Act or the Child Sex Offender   HB3469- 9 -LRB104 09192 RLC 22292 b1    Registration Act prior to January 1, 1996, shall be deemed 2    initially registered as of January 1, 1996; however, this 3    shall not be construed to extend the duration of 4    registration set forth in Section 7. 5        (2) Except as provided in subsection (c)(2.1) or 6    (c)(4), any person convicted or adjudicated prior to 7    January 1, 1996, whose liability for registration under 8    Section 7 has not expired, shall register in person prior 9    to January 31, 1996. 10        (2.1) A sex offender or sexual predator, who has never 11    previously been required to register under this Act, has a 12    duty to register if the person has been convicted of any 13    felony offense after July 1, 2011. A person who previously 14    was required to register under this Act for a period of 10 15    years and successfully completed that registration period 16    has a duty to register if: (i) the person has been 17    convicted of any felony offense after July 1, 2011, and 18    (ii) the offense for which the 10 year registration was 19    served currently requires a registration period of more 20    than 10 years. Notification of an offender's duty to 21    register under this subsection shall be pursuant to 22    Section 5-7 of this Act. 23        (2.5) Except as provided in subsection (c)(4), any 24    person who has not been notified of his or her 25    responsibility to register shall be notified by a criminal 26    justice entity of his or her responsibility to register.   HB3469- 10 -LRB104 09192 RLC 22292 b1    Upon notification the person must then register within 3 2    days of notification of his or her requirement to 3    register. Except as provided in subsection (c)(2.1), if 4    notification is not made within the offender's 10 year 5    registration requirement, and the Illinois State Police 6    determines no evidence exists or indicates the offender 7    attempted to avoid registration, the offender will no 8    longer be required to register under this Act. 9        (3) Except as provided in subsection (c)(4), any 10    person convicted on or after January 1, 1996, shall 11    register in person within 3 days after the entry of the 12    sentencing order based upon his or her conviction. 13        (4) Any person unable to comply with the registration 14    requirements of this Article because he or she is 15    confined, institutionalized, or imprisoned in Illinois on 16    or after January 1, 1996, shall register in person within 17    3 days of discharge, parole or release. 18        (5) The person shall provide positive identification 19    and documentation that substantiates proof of residence at 20    the registering address. 21        (6) No law enforcement agency shall impose a fee for 22    registration on any person required to register under this 23    Act. The person shall pay a $100 initial registration fee 24    and a $100 annual renewal fee to the registering law 25    enforcement agency having jurisdiction. The registering 26    agency may waive the registration fee if it determines   HB3469- 11 -LRB104 09192 RLC 22292 b1    that the person is indigent and unable to pay the 2    registration fee. Thirty-five dollars for the initial 3    registration fee and $35 of the annual renewal fee shall 4    be retained and used by the registering agency for 5    official purposes. Having retained $35 of the initial 6    registration fee and $35 of the annual renewal fee, the 7    registering agency shall remit the remainder of the fee to 8    State agencies within 30 days of receipt for deposit into 9    the State funds as follows:10            (A) Five dollars of the initial registration fee 11        and $5 of the annual fee shall be remitted to the State 12        Treasurer who shall deposit the moneys into the Sex 13        Offender Management Board Fund under Section 19 of the 14        Sex Offender Management Board Act. Money deposited 15        into the Sex Offender Management Board Fund shall be 16        administered by the Sex Offender Management Board and 17        shall be used by the Board to comply with the 18        provisions of the Sex Offender Management Board Act.19            (B) Thirty dollars of the initial registration fee 20        and $30 of the annual renewal fee shall be remitted to 21        the Illinois State Police which shall deposit the 22        moneys into the Offender Registration Fund. 23            (C) Thirty dollars of the initial registration fee 24        and $30 of the annual renewal fee shall be remitted to 25        the Attorney General who shall deposit the moneys into 26        the Attorney General Sex Offender Awareness, Training,   HB3469- 12 -LRB104 09192 RLC 22292 b1        and Education Fund. Moneys deposited into the Fund 2        shall be used by the Attorney General to administer 3        the I-SORT program and to alert and educate the 4        public, victims, and witnesses of their rights under 5        various victim notification laws and for training law 6        enforcement agencies, State's Attorneys, and medical 7        providers of their legal duties concerning the 8        prosecution and investigation of sex offenses. 9        The registering agency shall establish procedures to 10    document the receipt and remittance of the $100 initial 11    registration fee and $100 annual renewal fee.12    (d) Within 3 days after obtaining or changing employment 13and, if employed on January 1, 2000, within 5 days after that 14date, a person required to register under this Section must 15report, in person to the law enforcement agency having 16jurisdiction, the business name and address where he or she is 17employed. If the person has multiple businesses or work 18locations, every business and work location must be reported 19to the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction. 20(Source: P.A. 101-571, eff. 8-23-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 21    Section 15. The Murderer and Violent Offender Against 22Youth Registration Act is amended by changing Section 10 as 23follows: 24    (730 ILCS 154/10)  HB3469- 13 -LRB104 09192 RLC 22292 b1    Sec. 10. Duty to register. 2    (a) A violent offender against youth shall, within the 3time period prescribed in subsections (b) and (c), register in 4person and provide accurate information as required by the 5Illinois State Police. Such information shall include a 6current photograph, current address, current place of 7employment, the employer's telephone number, school attended, 8extensions of the time period for registering as provided in 9this Act and, if an extension was granted, the reason why the 10extension was granted and the date the violent offender 11against youth was notified of the extension. A person who has 12been adjudicated a juvenile delinquent for an act which, if 13committed by an adult, would be a violent offense against 14youth shall register as an adult violent offender against 15youth within 10 days after attaining 17 years of age. The 16violent offender against youth shall register: 17        (1) with the chief of police in the municipality in 18    which he or she resides or is temporarily domiciled for a 19    period of time of 5 or more days, unless the municipality 20    is the City of Chicago, in which case he or she shall 21    register at a fixed location designated by the 22    Superintendent of the Chicago Police Department; or 23        (2) with the sheriff in the county in which he or she 24    resides or is temporarily domiciled for a period of time 25    of 5 or more days in an unincorporated area or, if 26    incorporated, no police chief exists.   HB3469- 14 -LRB104 09192 RLC 22292 b1    If the violent offender against youth is employed at or 2attends an institution of higher education, he or she shall 3register: 4        (i) with the chief of police in the municipality in 5    which he or she is employed at or attends an institution of 6    higher education, unless the municipality is the City of 7    Chicago, in which case he or she shall register at a fixed 8    location designated by the Superintendent of the Chicago 9    Police Department; or10        (ii) with the sheriff in the county in which he or she 11    is employed or attends an institution of higher education 12    located in an unincorporated area, or if incorporated, no 13    police chief exists. 14    For purposes of this Act, the place of residence or 15temporary domicile is defined as any and all places where the 16violent offender against youth resides for an aggregate period 17of time of 5 or more days during any calendar year. Any person 18required to register under this Act who lacks a fixed address 19or temporary domicile must notify, in person, the agency of 20jurisdiction of his or her last known address within 5 days 21after ceasing to have a fixed residence.22    Any person who lacks a fixed residence must report weekly, 23in person, with the sheriff's office of the county in which he 24or she is located in an unincorporated area, or with the chief 25of police in the municipality in which he or she is located. 26The agency of jurisdiction will document each weekly   HB3469- 15 -LRB104 09192 RLC 22292 b1registration to include all the locations where the person has 2stayed during the past 7 days. 3    The violent offender against youth shall provide accurate 4information as required by the Illinois State Police. That 5information shall include the current place of employment of 6the violent offender against youth. 7    (a-5) An out-of-state student or out-of-state employee 8shall, within 5 days after beginning school or employment in 9this State, register in person and provide accurate 10information as required by the Illinois State Police. Such 11information will include current place of employment, school 12attended, and address in state of residence. The out-of-state 13student or out-of-state employee shall register: 14        (1) with the chief of police in the municipality in 15    which he or she attends school or is employed for a period 16    of time of 5 or more days or for an aggregate period of 17    time of more than 30 days during any calendar year, unless 18    the municipality is the City of Chicago, in which case he 19    or she shall register at a fixed location designated by 20    the Superintendent of the Chicago Police Department; or 21        (2) with the sheriff in the county in which he or she 22    attends school or is employed for a period of time of 5 or 23    more days or for an aggregate period of time of more than 24    30 days during any calendar year in an unincorporated area 25    or, if incorporated, no police chief exists.26    The out-of-state student or out-of-state employee shall   HB3469- 16 -LRB104 09192 RLC 22292 b1provide accurate information as required by the Illinois State 2Police. That information shall include the out-of-state 3student's current place of school attendance or the 4out-of-state employee's current place of employment. 5    (b) Any violent offender against youth regardless of any 6initial, prior, or other registration, shall, within 5 days of 7beginning school, or establishing a residence, place of 8employment, or temporary domicile in any county, register in 9person as set forth in subsection (a) or (a-5). 10    (c) The registration for any person required to register 11under this Act shall be as follows: 12        (1) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this 13    subsection (c), any person who has not been notified of 14    his or her responsibility to register shall be notified by 15    a criminal justice entity of his or her responsibility to 16    register. Upon notification the person must then register 17    within 5 days of notification of his or her requirement to 18    register. If notification is not made within the 19    offender's 10 year registration requirement, and the 20    Illinois State Police determines no evidence exists or 21    indicates the offender attempted to avoid registration, 22    the offender will no longer be required to register under 23    this Act. 24        (2) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this 25    subsection (c), any person convicted on or after the 26    effective date of this Act shall register in person within   HB3469- 17 -LRB104 09192 RLC 22292 b1    5 days after the entry of the sentencing order based upon 2    his or her conviction. 3        (3) Any person unable to comply with the registration 4    requirements of this Act because he or she is confined, 5    institutionalized, or imprisoned in Illinois on or after 6    the effective date of this Act shall register in person 7    within 5 days of discharge, parole or release. 8        (4) The person shall provide positive identification 9    and documentation that substantiates proof of residence at 10    the registering address. 11        (5) No law enforcement agency shall impose a fee for 12    registration on any person required to register under this 13    Act The person shall pay a $20 initial registration fee 14    and a $10 annual renewal fee. The fees shall be deposited 15    into the Offender Registration Fund. The fees shall be 16    used by the registering agency for official purposes. The 17    agency shall establish procedures to document receipt and 18    use of the funds. The law enforcement agency having 19    jurisdiction may waive the registration fee if it 20    determines that the person is indigent and unable to pay 21    the registration fee. 22    (d) Within 5 days after obtaining or changing employment, 23a person required to register under this Section must report, 24in person to the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction, 25the business name and address where he or she is employed. If 26the person has multiple businesses or work locations, every   HB3469- 18 -LRB104 09192 RLC 22292 b1business and work location must be reported to the law 2enforcement agency having jurisdiction. 3(Source: P.A. 101-571, eff. 8-23-19; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.